Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,160
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting
requirement for directors.

(MBCA
10.21) (a) A bylaw that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board
of directors may be amended or repealed:

(1) If originally adopted
by the shareholders, only by the shareholders unless the bylaw otherwise provides;
or

(2)
If adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the
board of directors.

(b)
A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that increases a quorum or
voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it can be amended
or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board
of directors.

(c)
Action by the board of directors under subsection (a) of this section to amend
or repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board
of directors must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same
vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then
in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 160.
January 1, 2017